Massachusetts, session 194th, H2126.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 26 of Chapter 149 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after words "pension plans", in line 46, the 
following:- ", bona fide apprenticeship and training programs approved by the commonwealth 
which comply with the requirements of Sections 11E to 11L, inclusive, of Chapter 23 of the 
General Laws,". 
SECTION 2. Section 27 of Chapter 149 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended by inserting after the words "pension plans", in line 44, the following: ", bona fide 
apprenticeship and training programs approved by the commonwealth which comply with the 
requirements of sections 11E to 11L, inclusive, of Chapter 23 of the General Laws,". 

of 3 10  SECTION 3. Said section 27 of Chapter 149, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
inserting after the words "pension plan" the following:- ", a bona fide apprenticeship and training 
program approved by the commonwealth which comply with the requirements of sections 11E to 
11L, inclusive, of Chapter 23 of the General Laws,". 
SECTION 4. Said section 27 of Chapter 149, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
inserting after the words "health and welfare funds", in line 54, the following:- ", bona fide 
apprenticeship and training programs approved by the commonwealth which comply with the 
requirements of sections 11E to 11L, inclusive, of Chapter 23 of the General Laws,". 
SECTION 5. Said section 27 of Chapter 149, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
inserting after the words " welfare funds", in lines 60 to 61,  the following:- ", bona fide 
apprenticeship and training programs approved by the commonwealth which comply with the 
requirements of sections 11E to 11L, inclusive, of Chapter 23 of the General Laws". 
SECTION 6. Said section 27 of Chapter 149, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
inserting after the words " welfare funds", in line 74, the following:- ", bona fide apprenticeship 
and training programs approved by the commonwealth which comply with the requirements of 
sections 11E to 11L, inclusive, of Chapter 23 of the General Laws,". 
SECTION 7. Said section 27 of Chapter 149, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
inserting after the words "welfare funds", in line 80, the following:- ", bona fide apprenticeship 
and training programs approved by the commonwealth which comply with the requirements of 
sections 11E to 11L, inclusive, of Chapter 23 of the General Laws". 
SECTION 8. Said section 27 of Chapter 149, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
inserting after the words "welfare funds", in line 90, the following:- ", bona fide apprenticeship 

of 3 32 and training programs approved by the commonwealth which comply with the requirements of 
sections 1B to 11L, inclusive, of Chapter 23 of the General Laws".